Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2733
Refunding bonds; general provisions applicable.

The issue of refunding bonds, the manner of sale, the maturities, interest rates, form, and other details thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the city in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of sections 18-2724 to 18-2736 relating to the issue of bonds other than refunding bonds insofar as the same may be applicable.

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 10.